California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
(3) “Judgment creditor” shall be deemed references to the plaintiff.

(4) “Judgment debtor” shall be deemed references to the defendant.

(5) “Levy” shall be deemed references to levy of attachment.

(6) “Notice of levy” shall be deemed references to notice of attachment.

(7) “Release” of property shall be deemed references to release of property pursuant to this title.

(8) “Satisfaction or discharge of the judgment” shall be deemed references to the satisfaction or termination of the attachment.

(9) “Writ” or “writ of execution” shall be deemed references to a writ of attachment.

(c) For the purposes of this section, references in Section 701.070 to:

(1) “Levy” shall be deemed references to levy of attachment.

(2) “Notice of the levy” shall be deemed references to notice of attachment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 484, Sec. 4.   (AB 2364)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

488.610.

(a) At the time of service of a copy of the writ of attachment and a notice of attachment on a third person, the levying officer shall request the third person to give the levying officer a garnishee’s memorandum containing the information required by this section. Within 10 days after the request is made, the third person shall mail or deliver the garnishee’s memorandum to the levying officer whether or not the levy is effective.

(b) The garnishee’s memorandum shall be executed under oath and shall contain the following information:

(1) A description of any property of the defendant sought to be attached that is not delivered to the levying officer and the reason for not delivering the
 property.

(2) A statement of the amount and terms of any obligation to the defendant sought to be attached that is due and payable and is not paid to the levying officer and the reason for not paying the obligation.

(3) A statement of the amount and terms of any obligation to the defendant sought to be attached that is not due and payable at the time of levy.

(4) A description of claims and rights of other persons to the attached property or obligation that are known to the third person and the names and addresses of those other persons.

(5) A statement that the garnishee holds neither any property nor any obligations in favor of the judgment debtor.

(c) If a garnishee’s memorandum is
 received from the third person, the levying officer shall promptly mail or deliver a copy of the memorandum to the plaintiff and attach the original to the writ when it is returned to the court. If a garnishee’s memorandum is not received from the third person, the levying officer shall so state in the return.

(d) Except as provided in subdivisions (e) and (f), if a third person does not give the levying officer a garnishee’s memorandum within the time provided in subdivision (a) or does not provide complete information, the third person may, in the court’s discretion, be required to pay the costs and reasonable attorney’s fees incurred in any proceedings to obtain the information required in the garnishee’s memorandum.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), where a deposit account or property in a safe-deposit box is attached, the financial institution need not give a garnishee’s
 memorandum to the levying officer if the financial institution fully complies with the levy and, if a garnishee’s memorandum is required, the garnishee’s memorandum need provide information with respect only to property which is carried on the records available at the office or branch where the levy is made, unless the levy has been served at a central location designated by a financial institution in accordance with Section 684.115, in which case the garnishee’s memorandum shall apply to all offices and branches of the financial institution except to the extent acceptance of the levy at that central location is limited pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 684.115.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the third person need not give a
 garnishee’s memorandum to the levying officer if both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The third person has delivered to the levying officer all of the property sought to be attached.

(2) The third person has paid to the levying officer the amount due at the time of levy on any obligation to the defendant that was attached and there is no additional amount that thereafter will become payable on the obligation levied upon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 222, Sec. 1.   (AB 2067)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

488.620.

A third person who gives a garnishee’s memorandum pursuant to this title is not liable to any person for the disclosure in the garnishee’s memorandum of any information contained in the garnishee’s memorandum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 155, Sec. 8.3.   Effective June 30, 1983.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Management and Disposition of Attached Property [488.700. - 488.740.]

488.700.

(a) If property has been or is sought to be attached, the court may appoint a receiver or order the levying officer to take any action the court orders that is necessary to preserve the value of the property, including but not limited to selling the property, if the court determines that the property is perishable or will greatly deteriorate or greatly depreciate in value or that for some other reason the interests of the parties will be best served by the order. An order may be made under this subdivision upon application of the plaintiff, the defendant, or a person who has filed a third-party claim pursuant to Division 4
(commencing with Section 720.010) of Title 9. The application shall be made on noticed motion if the court so directs or a court rule so requires. Otherwise, the application may be made ex parte.

(b) If the levying officer determines that property is extremely perishable or will greatly deteriorate or greatly depreciate in value before a court order pursuant to subdivision (a) could be obtained, the levying officer may take any action necessary to preserve the value of the property or may sell the property. The levying officer is not liable for a determination made in good faith under this subdivision.

(c) Except as otherwise provided by order of the court, a sale of the property pursuant to this section shall be made in the manner provided by Article 6 (commencing with Section 701.510) of Chapter 3 of Division 2 of Title 9 and the proceeds shall be deposited in the court to abide
the judgment in the action. Notwithstanding subdivisions (b) and (d) of Section 701.530, notice of sale shall be posted and served at a reasonable time before sale, considering the character and condition of the property.

(d) If a receiver is appointed, the court shall fix the daily fee of the receiver and may order the plaintiff to pay the fees and expenses of the receiver in advance or may direct that the whole or any part of the fees and expenses be paid from the proceeds of any sale of the property. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 564) and Chapter 5a (commencing with Section 571) of Title 7 govern the appointment, qualifications, powers, rights, and duties of a receiver appointed under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 50.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

488.710.

(a) As used in this section, “instrument” means a check, draft, money order, or other order for the withdrawal of money from a financial institution, the United States, any state, or any public entity within any state.

(b) If an instrument is payable to the defendant on demand and comes into the possession of a levying officer pursuant to this title, the levying officer shall promptly endorse and present the instrument for payment.

(c) The levying officer shall endorse the instrument by writing on the instrument (1) the
name of the defendant, (2) the name and official title of the levying officer, and (3) the title of the court and the cause in which the writ was issued. The endorsement is as valid as if the instrument were endorsed by the defendant. No financial institution or public entity on which the instrument is drawn is liable to any person for payment of the instrument to the levying officer rather than to the defendant by reason of the endorsement. No levying officer is liable by reason of endorsing, presenting, and obtaining payment of the instrument. The funds or credit resulting from the payment of the instrument shall be held by the levying officer subject to the lien of attachment.

(d) If it appears from the face of the instrument that it has been tendered to the defendant in satisfaction of a claim or demand and that endorsement of the instrument is considered a release and satisfaction by the defendant of the claim or demand, the levying
officer shall not endorse the instrument unless the defendant has first endorsed it to the levying officer. If the defendant does not endorse the instrument to the levying officer, the levying officer shall hold the instrument for 30 days and is not liable to the defendant or to any other person for delay in presenting it for payment. At the end of the 30-day holding period, the levying officer shall return the instrument to the maker.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 50.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

488.720.

(a) The defendant may apply by noticed motion to the court in which the action is pending or in which the judgment in the action was entered for an order releasing the attachment of property to the extent that the value of the defendant’s interest in the property clearly exceeds the amount necessary to satisfy the amount to be secured by the attachment.

(b) The notice of motion shall state the grounds on which the motion is based and shall be accompanied by an affidavit supporting any factual issues raised and points and authorities supporting any legal issues raised.

(c) At the hearing on the motion, the court shall determine the value of the defendant’s interest in the property and order the release of the attachment of the property to the extent that the value of the defendant’s interest in the property attached clearly exceeds the amount necessary to satisfy the amount to be secured by the attachment. After entry of judgment in the action in which the property was attached, the court shall also take into consideration in determining whether the attachment is clearly excessive the value of any property not attached in the action that (1) has been levied upon pursuant to a writ of execution issued to satisfy the judgment in the action or (2) otherwise has been sought to be applied to the satisfaction of the judgment in the action.

(d) The court’s determinations shall be made upon the basis of the pleadings and other papers in the record; but,
upon good cause shown, the court may receive and consider at the hearing additional evidence, oral or documentary, and additional points and authorities, or it may continue the hearing for the production of the additional evidence or points and authorities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 50.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

488.730.

(a) The levying officer shall release attached property when the levying officer receives a written direction to release the property from the plaintiff’s attorney of record or, if the plaintiff does not have an attorney of record, from the plaintiff or when the levying officer receives a certified copy of a court order for release or when otherwise required to release the property. The release extinguishes any attachment lien in favor of the plaintiff on the property released.

(b) If the property to be released has been taken into custody under the levy, it shall
be released to the person from whom it was taken unless otherwise ordered by the court. If the person does not claim the property to be released, the levying officer shall retain custody of the property and shall serve on the person a notice of where possession of the property may be obtained. If the person does not claim the property within 30 days after the notice is served, the levying officer shall sell the property (other than cash which does not have a value exceeding its face value) in the manner provided by Article 6 (commencing with Section 701.510) of Chapter 3 of Division 2 of Title 9. The levying officer shall deposit the proceeds of sale and cash, after first deducting the levying officer’s costs, with the county treasurer of the county where the property is located payable to the order of the person. If the amount deposited is not claimed by the person or the legal representative of the person within five years after the deposit is made, by making application to the treasurer or other official
designated by the county, it shall be paid into the general fund of the county.

(c) If the property to be released has not been taken into custody under the levy, the levying officer shall release the attachment by issuing a written notice of release and serving it on the person who was served with a copy of the writ and a notice of attachment to create the lien.

(d) If the property to be released was levied upon by recording or filing a copy of the writ and a notice of attachment, the levying officer shall record or file a written notice of release in the same office. If the notice of attachment had been filed with the Secretary of State, any release shall have the effect prescribed in Section 697.650.

(e) The levying officer is not liable for releasing an attachment in accordance with this section and no other
person is liable for acting in conformity with the release.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 445, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

488.740.

If the defendant recovers judgment against the plaintiff and no timely motion for vacation of judgment or for judgment notwithstanding the verdict or for a new trial is filed and served and is pending and no appeal is perfected and undertaking executed and filed as provided in Section 921, any undertaking received from the defendant in the action, all the proceeds of sales and money collected by the levying officer, and all the property attached remaining in the levying officer’s hands shall be delivered to the person from whom it was collected or taken, unless otherwise ordered by the court; and the court shall order the discharge of any attachment
made in the action and the release of any property held thereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 50.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Undertakings [489.010. - 489.420.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [489.010. - 489.130.]

489.010.

The Bond and Undertaking Law (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 995. 010) of Title 14) applies to a bond given pursuant to this title, except to the extent this title prescribes a different rule or is inconsistent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 41, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

489.060.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), all undertakings given pursuant to this title shall be presented to a proper court for approval and upon approval shall be filed with the court in which the action is pending.

(b) If the surety on the undertaking is an admitted surety insurer, the undertaking is not required to be approved by the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 107.)
-------------------------------------------

489.130.

Where the court orders the amount of the undertaking increased pursuant to Section 489.220 or 489.410, the plaintiff’s failure to increase the amount of the undertaking is not a wrongful attachment within the meaning of Section 490.010.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 437.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Undertakings to Obtain Writ of Attachment or Protective Order [489.210. - 489.230.]

489.210.

Before issuance of a writ of attachment, a temporary protective order, or an order under subdivision (b) of Section 491.415, the plaintiff shall file an undertaking to pay the defendant any amount the defendant may recover for any wrongful attachment by the plaintiff in the action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 538, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

489.220.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the amount of an undertaking filed pursuant to this article shall be ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(b) If, upon objection to the undertaking, the court determines that the probable recovery for wrongful attachment exceeds the amount of the undertaking, it shall order the amount of the undertaking increased to the amount it determines to be the probable recovery for wrongful attachment if it is ultimately determined that the
attachment was wrongful.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 812, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

489.230.

(a) The notice of attachment shall include a statement, in a form adopted by the Judicial Council, advising the defendant that the undertaking has been filed and informing the defendant of the right to object to the undertaking. 

(b) The form for the temporary protective order shall include a statement comparable to the one required by subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 114.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Undertaking to Obtain Release of Attachment or Protective Order [489.310. - 489.320.]

489.310.

(a) Whenever a writ is issued, a defendant who has appeared in the action may apply by noticed motion to the court in which the action is pending for an order permitting the defendant to substitute an undertaking for any of his property in the state which has been or is subject to being attached.

(b) In a case (1) where the defendant applies for an order to release a portion of property which has been attached or (2) where the defendant applies for an order preventing the attachment of property and the amount of the undertaking to be given
is less than the amount to be secured by the attachment, the application shall include a statement, executed under oath, describing the property to be so released or so protected from attachment.

(c) The defendant shall file an undertaking to pay the plaintiff the value of the property released not exceeding the amount of any judgment which may be recovered by the plaintiff in the action against the defendant. The amount of the undertaking filed pursuant to this section shall be equal to the lesser of (1) the value of the property attached or prevented from being attached or (2) the amount specified by the writ to be secured by the attachment. The court shall issue such order upon the condition that a sufficient undertaking be filed.

(d) Where an action is against more than one defendant, any defendant may make such application. The
filing of an undertaking by such defendant shall not subject him to any demand against any other defendant; however, the levying officer shall not be prevented thereby from attaching, or be obliged to release from attachment, any property of any other defendant. Where all the defendants do not join in the application, the application shall include a statement, executed under oath, describing the character of the defendant’s title to the property and the manner in which the defendant acquired such title and stating whether any other defendant who has not joined in the application has an interest in the property. Where two or more defendants have an interest in the same property, a joint application and undertaking shall be filed to secure the release of such property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 437.)
-------------------------------------------

489.320.

(a) A defendant who has been served with a temporary protective order and who has appeared in the action may apply by noticed motion to the court in which the action is pending for an order terminating the temporary protective order with respect to that defendant.

(b) The defendant shall file an undertaking to pay the plaintiff the amount of any judgment recovered by the plaintiff in the action against the defendant. The amount of the undertaking filed pursuant to this section shall be equal to the amount sought to be secured by the attachment. The court shall
issue the order terminating the temporary protective order with respect to the defendant upon the condition that a sufficient undertaking be filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 52.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Undertaking on Appeal [489.410. - 489.420.]

489.410.

(a) At any time after entry of judgment in favor of the defendant and before perfection of an appeal under Section 921, upon motion of the defendant, the trial court may order an increase in the amount of the original undertaking on attachment in such amount, if any, as is justified by the detriment reasonably to be anticipated by continuing the attachment. Unless such undertaking is filed within 10 days after such order, the attachment shall be set aside and the property released therefrom.

(b) If an order increasing the undertaking is made, the amount of the undertaking on appeal
required by Section 921 shall be the same as the amount fixed by the trial court in such order.

(c) Neither the pendency nor granting of a motion timely filed and served by the plaintiff for vacation of judgment or for judgment notwithstanding the verdict or for new trial shall continue an attachment in force unless an undertaking is given by the plaintiff to pay all costs and damages sustained by continuing the attachment. The undertaking may be included in the undertaking specified in Section 921. If not so included, the same procedure shall apply as in case of an undertaking pursuant to Section 921.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1516.)
-------------------------------------------

489.420.

If a defendant appeals and the enforcement of the judgment against the defendant is stayed by the filing of a sufficient undertaking on appeal as provided by this code, all property of the defendant which has been attached in the action shall be released from the attachment upon the failure of the respondent to object to the undertaking within the time prescribed by statute or, if an objection is made, upon a determination that the undertaking is sufficient.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 115.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Liability for Wrongful Attachment [490.010. - 490.060.]

490.010.

A wrongful attachment consists of any of the following:

(a) The levy under a writ of attachment or the service of a temporary protective order in an action in which attachment is not authorized, except that it is not a wrongful attachment if both of the following are established:

(1) The levy was not authorized solely because of the prohibition of subdivision (c) of Section 483.010.

(2) The person who sold or leased, or licensed for use, the property,
 furnished the services, or loaned the money reasonably believed that it would not be used primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

(b) The levy under a writ of attachment or the service of a temporary protective order in an action in which the plaintiff does not recover judgment.

(c) The levy under writ of attachment obtained pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 484.510) of Chapter 4 or Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 485.010) on property exempt from attachment except where the plaintiff shows that the plaintiff reasonably believed that the property attached was not exempt from attachment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 53.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

490.020.

(a) The liability of a plaintiff for causing a wrongful attachment under Section 490.010 includes both of the following:

(1) All damages proximately caused to the defendant by the wrongful attachment.

(2) All costs and expenses, including attorney’s fees, reasonably expended in defeating the attachment.

(b) The liability of a plaintiff for wrongful attachment pursuant to Section 490.010 is limited by the amount of the
 undertaking.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 54.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

490.040.

The amount of any recovery for wrongful attachment shall be offset insofar as possible against any unsatisfied amounts owed to the plaintiff by the defendant on the judgment in the action for which wrongful attachment damages are awarded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1516.)
-------------------------------------------

490.060.

Nothing in this chapter limits the right to recover for damages caused by an attachment or protective order on any common law theory of recovery.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1516.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Attaching Plaintiff’s Miscellaneous Remedies [491.110. - 491.470.]



  ARTICLE 1. Examination of Third Person [491.110. - 491.200.]

491.110.

(a) Upon ex parte application by the plaintiff and proof by the plaintiff by affidavit or otherwise to the satisfaction of the proper court that the plaintiff has a right to attach order and that a third person has possession or control of property in which the defendant has an interest or is indebted to the defendant in an amount exceeding two hundred fifty dollars ($250), the court shall make an order directing the third person to appear before the court, or before a referee appointed by the court, at a time and place specified in the order, to answer concerning the property or debt. The affidavit in support of the plaintiff’s application may be
based on the affiant’s information and belief.

(b) Not less than 10 days prior to the date set for the examination, a copy of the order shall be:

(1) Served personally on the third person.

(2) Served personally or by mail on the defendant.

(c) If the property or the debt is described in the affidavit or application for an order under subdivision (a) in a manner reasonably adequate to permit it to be identified, service of the order on the third person creates a lien on the defendant’s interest in the property in the third person’s possession or control or on the debt owed by the third person to the defendant. The lien continues for a period of one year from the date of the order unless extended or sooner terminated by the court.

(d) The order shall contain the following statement in 14-point boldface type if printed or in capital letters if typed: “NOTICE TO PERSON SERVED. If you fail to appear at the time and place specified in this order, you may be subject to arrest and punishment for contempt of court and the court may make an order requiring you to pay the reasonable attorney’s fees incurred by the plaintiff in this proceeding.”

(e) The order is not effective unless, at the time it is served on the third person, the person serving the order tenders to the third person fees for the mileage necessary to be traveled from the third person’s residence to the place of examination. The fees shall be in the same amount generally provided for witnesses when legally required to attend civil proceedings in the court where the examination proceeding is to be conducted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 57.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

491.120.

In any proceeding for the examination of a third person under this article, witnesses, including the defendant, may be required to appear and testify before the court or referee in the same manner as upon the trial of an issue.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 57.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

491.130.

(a) The examination proceedings authorized by this article may be conducted by a referee appointed by the court. The referee may issue, modify, or vacate an order authorized by Section 491.190, may make a protective order authorized by Section 491.180, and may issue a warrant authorized by Section 491.160, and has the same power as the court to grant adjournments, to preserve order, and to subpoena witnesses to attend the examination, but only the court that ordered the reference has power to do any of the following:

(1) Punish for contempt for disobeying an order of the referee.

(2) Make an award of attorney’s fees pursuant to Section 491.160.

(3) Determine a third-party claim under Section 491.170.

(b) Only a member of the State Bar of California is eligible for appointment as a referee pursuant to this article.

(c) Nothing in subdivision (a) limits the power of a court to appoint a temporary judge pursuant to Section 21 of Article VI of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 57.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

491.140.

(a) If a corporation, partnership, association, trust, or other organization is served with an order to appear for an examination, it shall designate to appear and be examined one or more officers, directors, managing agents, or other persons who are familiar with its property and debts.

(b) If the order to appear for an examination requires the appearance of a specified individual, the specified individual shall appear for the examination and may be accompanied by one or more officers, directors, managing agents, or other persons familiar with the property and
debts of the corporation, partnership, association, trust, or other organization.

(c) If the order to appear for the examination does not require the appearance of a specified individual, the order shall advise the corporation, partnership, association, trust, or other organization of its duty to make a designation under subdivision (a).

(d) A corporation, partnership, association, trust, or other organization, whether or not a party, may appear at an examination through any authorized officer, director, or employee, whether or not the person is an attorney.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 538, Sec. 7.5.)
-------------------------------------------

491.150.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the proper court for examination of a person under this article is the court that issued the writ of attachment.

(b) A person sought to be examined may not be required to attend an examination before a court located outside the county in which the person resides or has a place of business unless the distance from the person’s place of residence or place of business to the place of examination is less than 150
miles.

(c) If a person sought to be examined does not reside or have a place of business in the county where the court that issued the writ is located, the superior court in the county where the person resides or has a place of business is a proper court for examination of the person.

(d) If the plaintiff seeks an examination of a person before a court other than the court that issued the writ, the plaintiff shall file an application that shall include all of the following:

(1) A certified copy of the complaint in the pending action.

(2) An affidavit in support of the application stating the place of residence or place of business of the person sought to be examined.

(3) Any necessary
affidavit or showing for the examination as required by Section 491.110.

(4) The filing fee for a motion as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 70617 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 75, Sec. 33.   Effective July 19, 2005.   Operative January 1, 2006, by Sec. 156 of Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

491.160.

(a) If an order requiring a person to appear for an examination was served by a sheriff, marshal, a person specially appointed by the court in the order, or a registered process server, and the person fails to appear:

(1) The court may do either of the following:

(A) Pursuant to a warrant, have the person brought before the court to answer for the failure to appear and may punish the person for contempt.

(B) Issue a warrant for the arrest of the person who failed to appear as required by the court order, pursuant to Section 1993.

(2) If the person’s failure to appear is without good cause, the plaintiff shall be awarded reasonable attorney’s fees incurred in the examination proceeding.

(b) A person who willfully makes an improper service of an order for an examination which subsequently results in the arrest pursuant to subdivision (a) of the person who fails to appear is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 277, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

491.170.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), if a third person examined pursuant to this article claims an interest in the property adverse to the defendant or denies the debt, the court may, if the plaintiff so requests, determine the interests in the property or the existence of the debt. Such a determination is conclusive as to the plaintiff, the defendant, and the third person, but an appeal may be taken from the determination in the manner provided for appeals from the court in which the proceeding takes place. The court may grant a continuance for a reasonable time for discovery proceedings, the production of evidence, or other preparation for the
hearing.

(b) The court may not make the determination provided in subdivision (a) if the third person’s claim is made in good faith and any of the following conditions is satisfied:

(1) The court would not be a proper court for the trial of an independent civil action (including a creditor’s suit) for the determination of the interests in the property or the existence of the debt, and the third person objects to the determination of the matter under subdivision (a).

(2) At the time an order for examination pursuant to this article is served on the third person a civil action (including a creditor’s suit) is pending with respect to the interests in the property or the existence of the debt.

(3) The court determines that the interests in the property or
the existence of the debt should be determined in a creditor’s suit.

(c) Upon application of the plaintiff made ex parte, the court may make an order forbidding transfer of the property to the defendant or payment of the debt to the defendant until the interests in the property or the existence of the debt is determined pursuant to subdivision (a) or until a creditor’s suit may be commenced and an order obtained pursuant to Section 491.340. An undertaking may be required in the discretion of the court. The court may modify or vacate the order at any time with or without a hearing on such terms as are just.

(d) Upon application of the plaintiff upon noticed motion, the court, if it determines that the defendant probably owns an interest in the property or that the debt probably is owed to the defendant, may make an order forbidding the transfer or other disposition of the property
to any person or forbidding payment of the debt until the interests in the property or the existence of the debt is determined pursuant to subdivision (a) or until a creditor’s suit may be commenced and an order obtained pursuant to Section 491.340. The court shall require the plaintiff to furnish an undertaking as provided in Section 529. The court may modify or vacate the order at any time after notice and hearing on such terms as are just.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 57.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

491.180.

In any proceeding under this article, the court may, on motion of the person to be examined or on its own motion, make such protective orders as justice may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 57.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

491.190.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), at the conclusion of a proceeding pursuant to this article:

(1) The court may order the defendant’s interest in the property in the possession or under the control of the third person or a debt owed by the third person to the defendant to be attached in the manner and under the conditions provided by this title or to be delivered or paid to the levying officer if the levying officer has a writ of attachment permitting the attachment of the property or debt. After the property or debt has been attached, the order may be enforced as provided in
Section 491.360. The order creates a lien on the property or debt. The lien continues for a period of one year from the date of the order unless the court extends or reduces the period of the existence of the lien.

(2) If the property or debt has previously been attached, the court may make an order determining the third person’s liability, and the order may be enforced as provided in Section 491.360.

(b) If a third person examined pursuant to this article claims an interest in the property adverse to the defendant or denies the debt and the court does not determine the matter as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 491.170, the court may not make an order under subdivision (a) of this section, but may make an order pursuant to subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 491.170 forbidding transfer or payment to the extent authorized by that section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 57.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

491.200.

A lien created under this article continues on property subject to the lien notwithstanding the transfer or encumbrance of the property subject to the lien unless the transfer or encumbrance is made to a person listed in Section 697.740.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 57.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Creditor’s Suit [491.310. - 491.370.]

491.310.

If a third person has possession or control of property in which the defendant has an interest or is indebted to the defendant and the property or debt has been subjected to an attachment lien, the plaintiff may bring an action against the third person to enforce the third person’s liability under this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 57.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

491.320.

The defendant shall be joined in an action brought pursuant to this article but is not an indispensable party. The residence of the defendant may not be considered in the determination of proper venue unless otherwise provided by contract between the defendant and the third person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 57.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

491.330.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), an action shall be commenced pursuant to this article before the expiration of the later of the following times:

(1) The time when the defendant may bring an action against the third person concerning the property or debt.
